Utah statutes.
11-27-2.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Advance refunding bonds" means refunding bonds issued for the purpose of
refunding outstanding bonds in advance of their maturity.
(2)  "Assessments" means a special tax levied against property within a
special improvement district to pay all or a portion of the costs of making
improvements in the district.
(3)  "Bond" means any revenue bond, general obligation bond, tax increment
bond, special improvement bond, local building authority bond, or refunding
bond.
(4)  "General obligation bond" means any bond, note, warrant, certificate of
indebtedness, or other obligation of a public body payable in whole or in part
from revenues derived from ad valorem taxes and that constitutes an
indebtedness within the meaning of any applicable constitutional or statutory
debt limitation.
(5)  "Governing body" means the council, commission, county legislative body,
board of directors, board of trustees, board of education, board of regents,
or other legislative body of a public body designated in this chapter that is
vested with the legislative powers of the public body, and, with respect to
the state, the State Bonding Commission created by Section 63B-1-201.
(6)  "Government obligations" means:
(a)  direct obligations of the United States of America, or other securities,
the principal of and interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by the
United States of America; or
(b)  obligations of any state, territory, or possession of the United States,
or of any of the political subdivisions of any state, territory, or possession
of the United States, or of the District of Columbia described in Section
103(a), Internal Revenue Code of 1986.
(7)  "Issuer" means the public body issuing any bond or bonds.
(8)  "Public body" means the state or any agency, authority, instrumentality,
or institution of the state, or any municipal or quasi-municipal corporation,
political subdivision, agency, school district, local district, special
service district, or other governmental entity now or hereafter existing under
the laws of the state.
(9)  "Refunding bonds" means bonds issued under the authority of this chapter
for the purpose of refunding outstanding bonds.
(10)  "Resolution" means a resolution of the governing body of a public body
taking formal action under this chapter.
(11)  "Revenue bond" means any bond, note, warrant, certificate of
indebtedness, or other obligation for the payment of money issued by a public
body or any predecessor of any public body and that is payable from designated
revenues not derived from ad valorem taxes or from a special fund composed of
revenues not derived from ad valorem taxes, but excluding all of the
following:
(a)  any obligation constituting an indebtedness within the meaning of any
applicable constitutional or statutory debt limitation;
(b)  any obligation issued in anticipation of the collection of taxes, where
the entire issue matures not later than one year from the date of the issue;
and
(c)  any special improvement bond.
(12)  "Special improvement bond" means any bond, note, warrant, certificate of
indebtedness, or other obligation of a public body or any predecessor of any
public body that is payable from assessments levied on benefitted property and
from any special improvement guaranty fund.
(13)  "Special improvement guaranty fund" means any special improvement
guaranty fund established under Title 10, Chapter 6, Uniform Fiscal Procedures
Act for Utah Cities; Title 11, Chapter 42, Assessment Area Act; or any
predecessor or similar statute.
(14)  "Tax increment bond" means any bond, note, warrant, certificate of
indebtedness, or other obligation of a public body issued under authority of
Title 17C, Limited Purpose Local Government Entities - Community Development
and Renewal Agencies Act.
